Utah statutes.
75-7-814.   Specific powers of trustee.
(1)  Without limiting the authority conferred by Section 75-7-813, a trustee
may:
(a)  collect trust property and accept or reject additions to the trust
property from a settlor or any other person;
(b)  acquire or sell property, for cash or on credit, at public or private
sale;
(c)  exchange, partition, or otherwise change the character of trust property;
(d)  deposit trust money in an account in a regulated financial service
institution;
(e)  borrow money, with or without security from any financial institution,
including a financial institution that is serving as a trustee or one of its
affiliates, and mortgage or pledge trust property for a period within or
extending beyond the duration of the trust;
(f)  with respect to an interest in a proprietorship, partnership, limited
liability company, business trust, corporation, or other form of business or
enterprise, continue the business or other enterprise and take any action that
may be taken by shareholders, members, or property owners, including merging,
dissolving, or otherwise changing the form of business organization or
contributing additional capital;
(g)  with respect to stocks or other securities, exercise the rights of an
absolute owner, including the right to:
(i)  vote, or give proxies to vote, with or without power of substitution, or
enter into or continue a voting trust agreement;
(ii)  hold a security in the name of a nominee or in other form without
disclosure of the trust so that title may pass by delivery;
(iii)  pay calls, assessments, and other sums chargeable or accruing against
the securities, and sell or exercise stock subscription or conversion rights;
and
(iv)  deposit the securities with a depositary or other regulated financial
service institution;
(h)  with respect to an interest in real property, construct, or make ordinary
or extraordinary repairs to, alterations to, or improvements in, buildings or
other structures, demolish improvements, raze existing or erect new party
walls or buildings, subdivide or develop land, dedicate land to public use or
grant public or private easements, and make or vacate plats and adjust
boundaries;
(i)  enter into a lease for any purpose as lessor or lessee, including a lease
or other arrangement for exploration and removal of natural resources, with or
without the option to purchase or renew, for a period within or extending
beyond the duration of the trust;
(j)  grant an option involving a sale, lease, or other disposition of trust
property or acquire an option for the acquisition of property, including an
option exercisable beyond the duration of the trust, and exercise an option so
acquired;
(k)  insure the property of the trust against damage or loss and insure the
trustee, the trustee's agents, and beneficiaries against liability arising
from the administration of the trust;
(l)  abandon or decline to administer property of no value or of insufficient
value to justify its collection or continued administration;
(m)  with respect to possible liability for violation of environmental law:
(i)  inspect or investigate property the trustee holds or has been asked to
hold, or property owned or operated by an organization in which the trustee
holds or has been asked to hold an interest, for the purpose of determining
the application of environmental law with respect to the property;
(ii)  take action to prevent, abate, or otherwise remedy any actual or
potential violation of any environmental law affecting property held directly
or indirectly by the trustee, whether taken before or after the assertion of a
claim or the initiation of governmental enforcement;
(iii)  decline to accept property into trust or disclaim any power with
respect to property that is or may be burdened with liability for violation of
environmental law;
(iv)  compromise claims against the trust which may be asserted for an alleged
violation of environmental law; and
(v)  pay the expense of any inspection, review, abatement, or remedial action
to comply with environmental law;
(n)  pay or contest any claim, settle a claim by or against the trust, and
release, in whole or in part, a claim belonging to the trust;
(o)  pay taxes, assessments, compensation of the trustee and of employees and
agents of the trust, and other expenses incurred in the administration of the
trust;
(p)  exercise elections with respect to federal, state, and local taxes;
(q)  select a mode of payment under any employee benefit or retirement plan,
annuity, or life insurance payable to the trustee, exercise rights thereunder,
including exercise of the right to indemnification for expenses and against
liabilities, and take appropriate action to collect the proceeds;
(r)  make loans out of trust property, including loans to a beneficiary on
terms and conditions the trustee considers to be fair and reasonable under the
circumstances, and the trustee has a lien on future distributions for
repayment of those loans;
(s)  pledge trust property to guarantee loans made by others to the
beneficiary;
(t)  appoint a trustee to act in another jurisdiction with respect to trust
property located in the other jurisdiction, confer upon the appointed trustee
all of the powers and duties of the appointing trustee, require that the
appointed trustee furnish security, and remove any trustee so appointed;
(u)  pay an amount distributable to a beneficiary who is under a legal
disability or who the trustee reasonably believes is incapacitated, by paying
it directly to the beneficiary or applying it for the beneficiary's benefit,
or by:
(i)  paying it to the beneficiary's conservator or, if the beneficiary does
not have a conservator, the beneficiary's guardian;
(ii)  paying it to the beneficiary's custodian under Title 75, Chapter 5a,
Uniform Transfers to Minors Act;
(iii)  if the trustee does not know of a conservator, guardian, custodian, or
custodial trustee, paying it to an adult relative or other person having legal
or physical care or custody of the beneficiary, to be expended on the
beneficiary's behalf; or
(iv)  managing it as a separate fund on the beneficiary's behalf, subject to
the beneficiary's continuing right to withdraw the distribution;
(v)  on distribution of trust property or the division or termination of a
trust, make distributions in divided or undivided interests, allocate
particular assets in proportionate or disproportionate shares, value the trust
property for those purposes, and adjust for resulting differences in
valuation;
(w)  resolve a dispute concerning the interpretation of the trust or its
administration by mediation, arbitration, or other procedure for alternative
dispute resolution;
(x)  prosecute or defend an action, claim, or judicial proceeding in any
jurisdiction to protect trust property and the trustee in the performance of
the trustee's duties;
(y)  sign and deliver contracts and other instruments that are useful to
achieve or facilitate the exercise of the trustee's powers; and
(z)  on termination of the trust, exercise the powers appropriate to finalize
the administration of the trust and distribute the trust property to the
persons entitled to it.
(2)  A trustee may delegate investment and management functions that a prudent
trustee of comparable skills could properly delegate under the circumstances.
(a)  The trustee shall exercise reasonable care, skill, and caution in:
(i)  selecting the agent;
(ii)  establishing the scope and terms of the delegation consistent with the
purposes of the trust; and
(iii)  periodically reviewing the agent's actions to monitor the agent's
performance and compliance with the terms of the delegation.
(b)  In performing a delegated function, an agent has a duty to the trust to
exercise reasonable care to comply with the terms of the delegation.
(c)  A trustee who complies with the requirements of this Subsection (2) is
not liable to the beneficiaries or to the trust for the decisions or actions
of the agent to whom the function was delegated.
